Washington statutes.
RCW 6.01.030

Direction of writ when sheriff a party.

If the sheriff is a party or otherwise interested in an action in which a writ of execution, attachment, or replevin is to be served, the writ shall be directed to the coroner of the county, or the officer exercising the powers and performing the duties of coroner if there is no coroner, and the person to whom the writ is thus directed shall perform the duties of the sheriff.

[ 1987 c 442 s 103.]